Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6905.01
Enrollment date, defined.

Enrollment date means the first day of coverage in the health benefit plan or, if earlier, the first day of the waiting period.

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 39.